California statutes. Corporations Code
(h) (1) Whenever members are required or permitted to take any action at a meeting, a written notice of the meeting shall be given not less than 10 days nor more than 60 days before the date of the meeting to each member entitled to vote at the meeting. The
 notice shall state the place, date, and hour of the meeting, the means of electronic transmission by and to the limited liability company or electronic video screen communication, if any, and the general nature of the business to be transacted. No other business may be transacted at that meeting.

(2) Any report or any notice of a members’ meeting shall be given personally, by electronic transmission by the limited liability company, or by mail or other means of written communication, addressed to the member at the address of the member appearing on the books of the limited liability company or given by the member to the limited liability company for the purpose of notice, or, if no address appears or is given, at the place where the principal office of the limited liability company is located or by publication at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the principal office is located. The notice or report shall
 be deemed to have been given at the time when delivered personally, delivered by electronic transmission by the limited liability company, deposited in the mail, or sent by other means of written communication. An affidavit of mailing or delivered by electronic transmission by the limited liability company of any notice or report in accordance with this article, executed by a manager, shall be prima facie evidence of the giving of the notice or report.

(3) If any notice or report addressed to the member at the address of the member appearing on the books of the limited liability company is returned to the limited liability company by the United States Postal Service marked to indicate that the United States Postal Service is unable to deliver the notice or report to the member at the address, all future notices or reports shall be deemed to have been duly given without further mailing if they are available for the member at the principal office
 of the limited liability company for a period of one year from the date of the giving of the notice or report to all other members.

(4) Notice given by electronic transmission by the limited liability company under this subdivision shall be valid only if it complies with paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17701.02.

Notwithstanding this condition, notice shall not be given by electronic transmission by the limited liability company under this subdivision after either of the following has occurred:

(A) The limited liability company is unable to deliver two consecutive notices to the member by that means.

(B) The inability to so deliver the notices to the member becomes known to the secretary, any assistant secretary, the transfer agent, or any other person responsible
 for the giving of the notice.

(5) Upon written request to a manager by any person entitled to call a meeting of members, the manager shall immediately cause notice to be given to the members entitled to vote that a meeting will be held at a time requested by the person calling the meeting, not less than 10 days nor more than 60 days after the receipt of the request. If the notice is not given within 20 days after receipt of the request, the person entitled to call the meeting may give the notice or, upon the application of that person, the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the limited liability company is located, or if the principal office is not in this state, the county in which the limited liability company’s address in this state is located, shall summarily order the giving of the notice, after notice to the limited liability company affording it an opportunity to be heard. The procedure provided in subdivision
 (c) of Section 305 shall apply to the application. The court may issue any order as may be appropriate, including, without limitation, an order designating the time and place of the meeting, the record date for determination of members entitled to vote, and the form of notice.

(i) When a members’ meeting is adjourned to another time or place, unless the articles of organization or a written operating agreement otherwise require and except as provided in this subdivision, notice need not be given of the adjourned meeting if the time and place thereof or the means of electronic transmission by and to the limited liability company or electronic video screen communication, if any, are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken. At the adjourned meeting, the limited liability company may transact any business that may have been transacted at the original meeting. If the adjournment is for more than 45 days, or if after the
 adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each member of record entitled to vote at the meeting.

(j) The actions taken at any meeting of members, however called and noticed, and wherever held, have the same validity as if taken at a meeting duly held after regular call and notice, if a quorum is present either in person or by proxy, and if, either before or after the meeting, each of the members entitled to vote, not present in person or by proxy, provides a waiver of notice or consents to the holding of the meeting or approves the minutes of the meeting in writing. All waivers, consents, and approvals shall be filed with the limited liability company records or made a part of the minutes of the meeting after conversion to the form in which those records or minutes are kept. Attendance of a person at a meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of the meeting, except
 when the person objects, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened. Attendance at a meeting is not a waiver of any right to object to the consideration of matters required by this title to be included in the notice but not so included, if the objection is expressly made at the meeting. Neither the business to be transacted nor the purpose of any meeting of members need be specified in any written waiver of notice, unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or operating agreement, except as provided in subdivision (l).

(k) Members may participate in a meeting of the limited liability company through the use of conference telephones or electronic video screen communication, as long as all members participating in the meeting can hear one another, or by electronic transmission by and to the limited liability company pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of
 subdivision (i) of Section 17701.02. Participation in a meeting pursuant to this provision constitutes presence in person at that meeting.

(l) Any action approved at a meeting, other than by unanimous approval of those entitled to vote, shall be valid only if the general nature of the proposal so approved was stated in the notice of meeting or in any written waiver of notice.

(m) (1) A majority of the members represented in person or by proxy shall constitute a quorum at a meeting of members.

(2) The members present at a duly called or held meeting at which a quorum is present may continue to transact business until adjournment, notwithstanding the loss of a quorum, if any action taken after loss of a quorum, other than adjournment, is approved by the requisite percentage of interests of members
 specified in this title or in the articles of organization or a written operating agreement.

(3) In the absence of a quorum, any meeting of members may be adjourned from time to time by the vote of a majority of the interests represented either in person or by proxy, but no other business may be transacted, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(n) (1) Any action that may be taken at any meeting of the members may be taken without a meeting if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so taken, is signed and delivered to the limited liability company within 60 days of the record date for that action by members having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take that action at a meeting at which all members entitled to vote thereon were present and voted.

(2) Unless the consents of all members entitled to vote have been solicited in writing, (A) notice of any member approval of an amendment to the articles of organization or operating agreement, a dissolution of the limited liability company as provided in Section 17707.01, or a merger of the limited liability company as provided in Section 17710.10, without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given at least 10 days before the consummation of the action authorized by the approval, and (B) prompt notice shall be given of the taking of any other action approved by members without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent, to those members entitled to vote who have not consented in writing.

(3) Any member giving a written consent, or the member’s proxyholder, may revoke the consent personally or by proxy by a writing received by the limited liability company prior to the time that written consents of
 members having the minimum number of votes that would be required to authorize the proposed action have been filed with the limited liability company, but may not do so thereafter. This revocation is effective upon its receipt at the office of the limited liability company required to be maintained pursuant to Section 17701.13.

(o) The use of proxies in connection with this section shall be governed in the same manner as in the case of corporations formed under the General Corporation Law, Division 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 1.

(p) In order that the limited liability company may determine the members of record entitled to notices of any meeting or to vote, or entitled to receive any distribution or to exercise any rights in respect of any other lawful action, a manager, or members representing more than 10 percent of the interests of members, may fix, in advance, a
 record date, that is not more than 60 days nor less than 10 days prior to the date of the meeting and not more than 60 days prior to any other action. If no record date is fixed the following shall apply:

(1) The record date for determining members entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of members shall be at the close of business on the business day next preceding the day on which notice is given or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the business day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held.

(2) The record date for determining members entitled to give consent to limited liability company action in writing without a meeting shall be the day on which the first written consent is given.

(3) The record date for determining members for any other purpose shall be at the close of business
 on the day on which the managers adopt the resolution relating thereto, or the 60th day prior to the date of the other action, whichever is later.

(4) The determination of members of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of members shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting unless a manager or the members who called the meeting fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting, but the manager or the members who called the meeting shall fix a new record date if the meeting is adjourned for more than 45 days from the date set for the original meeting.

(q) A meeting of the members may be conducted, in whole or in part, by electronic transmission by and to the limited liability company or by electronic video screen communication if both of the following requirements are met:

(1) The limited liability
 company implements reasonable measures to provide members, in person or by proxy, a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the members, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently with those proceedings.

(2) When any member votes or takes other action at the meeting by means of electronic transmission to the limited liability company or electronic video screen communication, a record of that vote or action shall be maintained by the limited liability company.

(r) The articles of organization or a written operating agreement may provide to all or certain identified members of a specified class or group of members the right to vote separately or with all or any class or group of members on any matter. Voting by members may be on a per capita, number, financial interest, class,
 group, or any other basis. If no voting provision is contained in the articles of organization or written operating agreement, each of the following shall apply:

(1) The members of a limited liability company shall vote in proportion to their interests in current profits of the limited liability company or, in the case of a member who has assigned the member’s entire transferable interest in the limited liability company to a person who has not been admitted as a member, in proportion to the interest in current profits that the assigning member would have, had the assignment not been made.

(2) Any amendment to the articles of organization or operating agreement shall require the unanimous vote of all members.

(3) In all other matters in which a vote is required, except as otherwise provided in this section, a vote of
 a majority of the members shall be sufficient.

(s) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the articles of organization or operating agreement, in no event shall the articles of organization be amended by a vote of less than a majority of the members.

(t) Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the articles of organization or operating agreement, members shall have the right to vote on a dissolution of the limited liability company as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 17707.01, on a conversion to another business entity as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 17710.03, and on a merger of the limited liability company as provided in Section 17710.12.

(u) A written operating agreement may provide for the appointment of officers, including, but not limited to, a chairperson or a president, or
 both a chairperson and a president, a secretary, a chief financial officer, and any other officers with the titles, powers, and duties as shall be specified in the articles of organization or operating agreement or as determined by the managers or members. An officer may, but does not need to, be a member or manager of the limited liability company, and any number of offices may be held by the same person.

(v) Officers, if any, shall be appointed in accordance with the written operating agreement or, if no such provision is made in the operating agreement, any officers shall be appointed by the managers and shall serve at the pleasure of the managers, subject to the rights, if any, of an officer under any contract of employment. Any officer may resign at any time upon written notice to the limited liability company without prejudice to the rights, if any, of the limited liability under any contract to which the officer is a party.

(w) Subject to the provisions of the articles of organization, any note, mortgage, evidence of indebtedness, contract, certificate, statement, conveyance, or other instrument in writing, and any assignment or endorsement thereof, executed or entered into between any limited liability company and any other person, when signed by the chairperson of the board, the president, or any vice president and any secretary, any assistant secretary, the chief financial officer, or any assistant treasurer of the limited liability company, is not invalidated as to the limited liability company by any lack of authority of the signing officers in the absence of actual knowledge on the part of the other person that the signing officers had no authority to execute the same.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 775, Sec. 7.   (AB 506)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17704.08.

(a) A limited liability company shall reimburse for any payment made and indemnify for any debt, obligation, or other liability incurred by a member of a member-managed limited liability company or the manager of a manager-managed limited liability company in the course of the member’s or manager’s activities on behalf of the limited liability company, if, in making the payment or incurring the debt, obligation, or other liability, the member or manager complied with the duties stated in Section 17704.09.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (g) of Section 17701.10, a limited liability company may reimburse for any payment made and may indemnify for any debt, obligation, or other liability incurred by a person not
 identified in subdivision (a), including, without limitation, any officer, employee, or agent of the limited liability company, in the course of that person’s activities on behalf of the limited liability company.

(c) A limited liability company may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person against liability asserted against or incurred by that person even if, under subdivision (g) of Section 17701.10, the operating agreement could not eliminate or limit the person’s liability to the limited liability company for the conduct giving rise to the liability.

(d) (1) Without limiting subdivision (a), to the extent that an agent of a limited liability company has been successful on the merits in defense or settlement of any claim, issue, or matter in any proceeding in which the agent was or is a party or is threatened to be made a party by reason of
 the fact that the person is or was an agent of the limited liability company, if the agent acted in good faith and in a manner that the agent reasonably believed to be in the best interests of the limited liability company and its members, the agent shall be indemnified against expenses actually and reasonably incurred by the agent in connection therewith.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the following terms have the following meanings:

(A) “Agent” means any person who is or was a member of a member-managed limited liability company, manager of a manager-managed limited liability company, officer, employee, or other agent of the limited liability company, or is or was serving at the request of the limited liability company as a manager, director, officer, employee, or agent of another foreign or domestic corporation, limited liability company or foreign limited liability
 company, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise, or was a manager, director, officer, employee, or agent of a foreign or domestic limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, trust, or other enterprise that was a predecessor of the limited liability company or of another enterprise at the request of the predecessor entity or other enterprise.

(B) “Expenses” include, without limitation, the attorney’s fees and any expenses of establishing a right to indemnification under this subdivision.

(C) “Proceeding” means any threatened, pending, or completed action or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, or investigative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 775, Sec. 8.   (AB 506)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17704.09.

(a) The fiduciary duties that a member owes to a member-managed limited liability company and the other members of the limited liability company are the duties of loyalty and care under subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) A member’s duty of loyalty to the limited liability company and the other members is limited to the following:

(1) To account to the limited liability company and hold as trustee for it any property, profit, or benefit derived by the member in the conduct and winding up of the activities of a limited liability company or derived from a use by the member of a limited liability company property, including the appropriation of a limited liability
 company opportunity.

(2) To refrain from dealing with the limited liability company in the conduct or winding up of the activities of the limited liability company as or on behalf of a person having an interest adverse to the limited liability company.

(3) To refrain from competing with the limited liability company in the conduct or winding up of the activities of the limited liability company.

(c) A member’s duty of care to a limited liability company and the other members in the conduct and winding up of the activities of the limited liability company is limited to refraining from engaging in grossly negligent or reckless conduct, intentional misconduct, or a knowing violation of law.

(d) A member shall discharge the duties to a limited liability
 company and the other members under this title or under the operating agreement and exercise any rights consistent with the obligation of good faith and fair dealing.

(e) A member does not violate a duty or obligation under this article or under the operating agreement merely because the member’s conduct furthers the member’s own interest.

(f) In a manager-managed limited liability company, all of the following rules apply:

(1) Subdivisions (a), (b), (c), and (e) apply to the manager or managers and not the members.

(2) Subdivision (d) applies to the members and managers.

(3) Except as otherwise provided, a member does not have any fiduciary duty to the limited liability company or to any
 other member solely by reason of being a member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 775, Sec. 9.   (AB 506)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17704.10.

(a) Upon the request of a member or transferee, for purposes reasonably related to the interest of that person as a member or a transferee, a manager or, if the limited liability company is member-managed, a member in possession of the requested information, shall promptly deliver, in writing, to the member or transferee, at the expense of the limited liability company, a copy of the information required to be maintained by paragraphs (1), (2), and (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 17701.13, and any written operating agreement of the limited liability company.

(b) Each member, manager, and transferee has the right, upon reasonable request, for purposes reasonably related to the interest of that person as a member,
 manager, or transferee, to each of the following:

(1) To inspect and copy during normal business hours any of the records required to be maintained pursuant to Section 17701.13.

(2) To obtain in writing from the limited liability company, promptly after becoming available, a copy of the limited liability company’s federal, state, and local income tax returns for each year.

(c) In the case of a limited liability company with more than 35 members, each of the following shall apply:

(1) A manager shall cause an annual report to be sent to each of the members not later than 120 days after the close of the fiscal year. The report, which may be sent by electronic transmission by the limited liability company (paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section
 17701.02) shall contain a balance sheet as of the end of the fiscal year and an income statement and a statement of cashflows for the fiscal year.

(2) Members representing at least 5 percent of the voting interests of members, or three or more members, may make a written request to a manager for an income statement of the limited liability company for the initial three-month, six-month, or nine-month period of the current fiscal year ending more than 30 days prior to the date of the request, and a balance sheet of the limited liability company as of the end of that period. The statement shall be delivered or mailed to the members within 30 days thereafter.

(3) The financial statements referred to in this section shall be accompanied by the report thereon, if any, of the independent accountants engaged by the limited liability company or, if there is no report, the certificate of
 the manager of the limited liability company that the financial statements were prepared without audit from the books and records of the limited liability company.

(d) A manager shall promptly furnish to a member a copy of any amendment to the articles of organization or operating agreement executed by a manager pursuant to a power of attorney from the member. The articles of organization or operating agreement may be sent by electronic transmission by the limited liability company.

(e) The limited liability company shall send or cause information to be sent in writing to each member or holder of a transferable interest within 90 days after the end of each taxable year the information necessary to complete federal and state income tax or information returns and, in the case of a limited liability company with 35 or fewer members, a copy of the limited liability company’s federal,
 state, and local income tax or information returns for the year.

(f) In addition to the remedies provided in Sections 17713.06 and 17713.07 and any other remedies, a court of competent jurisdiction may enforce the duty of making and mailing or delivering the information and financial statements required by this section and, for good cause shown, extend the time therefor.

(g) In any action under this section or under Section 17713.07, if the court finds the failure of the limited liability company to comply with the requirements of this section is without justification, the court may award an amount sufficient to reimburse the person bringing the action for the reasonable expenses incurred by that person, including attorney’s fees, in connection with the action or proceeding.

(h) Any waiver of the rights provided in
 this section shall be unenforceable.

(i) Any request, inspection, or copying by a member or holder of a transferable interest may be made by that person or by that person’s agent or attorney.

(j) Upon complaint that a limited liability company is failing to comply with the provisions of this section, or to afford to the members rights given to them in the articles of organization or operating agreement, the Attorney General may, in the name of the people of the State of California, send to the office required to be maintained pursuant to Section 17701.13, notice of the complaint.

(k) If the answer of the limited liability company is not received within 30 days of the date the notice was transmitted, or if the answer is not satisfactory, and if the enforcement of the rights of the aggrieved persons by private civil
 action, by class action, or otherwise, would be so burdensome or expensive as to be impracticable, the Attorney General may institute, maintain, or intervene in any court of competent jurisdiction or before any administrative agency for relief by way of injunction, the dissolution of entities, the appointment of receivers, or any other temporary, preliminary, provisional, or final remedies as may be appropriate to protect the rights of members or to restore the position of the members for the failure to comply with the requirements of Section 17701.13 or the articles of organization or the operating agreement. In any action, suit, or proceeding, there may be joined as parties all persons and entities responsible for or affected by the activity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 775, Sec. 10.   (AB 506)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



ARTICLE 5. Transferable Interests and Rights of Transferees and Creditors [17705.01. - 17705.04.]

17705.01.

A transferable interest is personal property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17705.02.

(a) With respect to a transfer, in whole or in part, of a transferable interest, all of the following apply:

(1) A transfer is permissible.

(2) A transfer does not by itself cause a member’s dissociation or a dissolution and winding up of the activities of a limited liability company.

(3) Subject to Section 17705.04, a transfer does not entitle the transferee to do any of the following:

(A) Vote or otherwise participate in the management or conduct of the activities of a limited liability company.

(B) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c) and Section 17704.10, have access to records or other information concerning the activities of a limited liability company.

(b) A transferee has the right to receive, in accordance with the transfer, distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled; provided, however, that the pledge or granting of a security interest, lien, or other encumbrance in or against any or all of the transferable interest of a transferor shall not cause the transferor to cease to be a member or grant to the transferee or to anyone else the power to exercise any rights or powers of a member, including, without limitation, the right to receive distributions to which the member is entitled.

(c) In a dissolution and winding up of a limited liability company, a transferee is
 entitled to an account of the limited liability company’s transactions only from the date of dissolution.

(d) A transferable interest may be evidenced by a certificate of the interest issued by the limited liability company in a record, and, subject to this article, the interest represented by the certificate may be transferred by a transfer of the certificate.

(e) A limited liability company need not give effect to a transferee’s rights under this section until the limited liability company has notice of the transfer.

(f) A transfer of a transferable interest in violation of a restriction on transfer contained in the operating agreement is ineffective as to a person having notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

(g) Except as otherwise
 provided in subdivision (b) of this section and paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 17706.02, when a member transfers a transferable interest, the transferor retains the rights of a member, other than the interest in distributions transferred, and retains all duties and obligations of a member.

(h) When a member transfers a transferable interest to a person that becomes a member with respect to the transferred interest, the transferee is liable for the member’s obligations under Section 17704.03 and subdivision (c) of Section 17704.06 known to the transferee when the transferee becomes a member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 775, Sec. 11.   (AB 506)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

17705.03.

(a) On application by a judgment creditor of a member or transferee, a court may enter a charging order against the transferable interest of the judgment debtor for the unsatisfied amount of the judgment. A charging order constitutes a lien on a judgment debtor’s transferable interest and requires the limited liability company to pay over to the person to which the charging order was issued any distribution that would otherwise be paid to the judgment debtor.

(b) To the extent necessary to effectuate the collection of distributions pursuant to a charging order in effect under subdivision (a), the court may do any of the following:

(1) Appoint a receiver of the distributions subject to the charging order, with the power to make all inquiries the judgment debtor might have made.

(2) Make all other orders necessary to give effect to the charging order.

(3) Upon a showing that distributions under a charging order will not pay the judgment debt within a reasonable time, foreclose the lien and order the sale of the transferable interest. The purchaser at the foreclosure sale obtains only the transferable interest, does not thereby become a member, and is subject to Section 17705.02.

(c) At any time before foreclosure under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), the member or transferee whose
 transferable interest is subject to a charging order under subdivision (a) may extinguish the charging order by satisfying the judgment and filing a certified copy of the satisfaction with the court that issued the charging order.

(d) At any time before foreclosure under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), a limited liability company or one or more members whose transferable interests are not subject to the charging order may pay to the judgment creditor the full amount due under the judgment and thereby succeed to the rights of the judgment creditor, including the charging order.

(e) This title does not deprive any member or transferee of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the member’s or transferee’s transferable interest.

(f) This section provides the exclusive remedy by which a person seeking to enforce a judgment against a member or transferee may, in the capacity of judgment creditor, satisfy the judgment from the judgment debtor’s transferable interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17705.04.

If a member dies, the deceased member’s personal representative or other legal representative may exercise the rights of a transferee provided in subdivision (c) of Section 17705.02 and, for the purposes of settling the estate, the rights of a current member under Section 17704.10.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------



ARTICLE 6. Member’s Dissociation [17706.01. - 17706.03.]

17706.01.

(a) A person has the power to dissociate as a member at any time, rightfully or wrongfully, by withdrawing as a member by express will pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 17706.02.

(b) A person’s dissociation from a limited liability company is wrongful only if either of the following apply to the dissociation:

(1) The dissociation is in breach of an express provision of the operating agreement.

(2) The dissociation occurs before the termination of the limited liability company and any of the following:

(A) The person withdraws as a member by express will.

(B) The person is expelled as a member by judicial order under subdivision (e) of Section 17706.02.

(C) The person is dissociated under subdivision (g) of Section 17706.02 by becoming a debtor in bankruptcy.

(D) In the case of a person that is not a trust other than a business trust, an estate, or an individual, the person is expelled or otherwise dissociated as a member because it dissolved or terminated.

(c) A person that wrongfully dissociates as a member is liable to the limited liability company and to the other members for any damages caused by the
 dissociation. The liability is in addition to any other debt, obligation, or other liability of the member to the limited liability company or the other members.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17706.02.

A person is dissociated as a member from a limited liability company when any of the following occur:

(a) The limited liability company has notice of the person’s express will to withdraw as a member, but, if the person specified a withdrawal date later than the date the limited liability company had notice, on that later date.

(b) An event stated in the operating agreement as causing the person’s dissociation to occur.

(c) The person is expelled as a member pursuant to the operating agreement.

(d) The person is expelled as a member by the unanimous consent of the other members because any of the following applies:

(1) It is unlawful to carry on the limited liability company’s activities with the person as a member.

(2) There has been a transfer of all of the person’s transferable interest in the limited liability company, other than either of the following:

(A) A transfer for security purposes.

(B) A charging order in effect under Section 17705.03 that has not been foreclosed.

(3) The person is a corporation and, within 90 days after the limited liability company notifies the
 person that it will be expelled as a member because the person has filed a certificate of dissolution or the equivalent, its charter has been revoked, or its right to conduct business has been suspended by the jurisdiction of its incorporation and the certificate of dissolution has not been revoked or its charter or right to conduct business has not been reinstated.

(4) The person is a limited liability company or partnership that has been dissolved and whose business is being wound up.

(e) On application by the limited liability company, the person is expelled as a member by judicial order because the person has done any of the following:

(1) Engaged, or is engaging, in wrongful conduct that has adversely and materially
 affected, or will adversely and materially affect, the limited liability company’s activities.

(2) Willfully or persistently committed, or is willfully and persistently committing, a material breach of the operating agreement or the person’s duties or obligations under Section 17704.09.

(3) Engaged, or is engaging, in conduct relating to the limited liability company’s activities that makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the activities with the person as a member.

(f) In the case of a person who is an individual, if either of the following applies:

(1) The person dies.

(2) In a
 member-managed limited liability company if either of the following applies:

(A) A guardian or general conservator for the person is appointed.

(B) There is a judicial order that the person has otherwise become incapable of performing the person’s duties as a member under this title or the operating agreement.

(g) In a member-managed limited liability company, the person becomes a debtor in bankruptcy.

(h) In the case of a person that is a trust or is acting as a member by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, the trust’s entire transferable interest in the limited liability company is distributed but not solely by reason of a substitution of a successor
 trustee.

(i) In the case of a person that is an estate or is acting as a member by virtue of being a personal representative of an estate, the estate’s entire transferable interest in the limited liability company is distributed but not solely by reason of a substitution of a successor personal representative.

(j) In the case of a member that is not an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, or estate, the termination of the member.

(k) The limited liability company participates in a merger under Article 10 (commencing with Section 17710.01), and either of the following applies:

(1) The limited liability company is not the
 surviving entity.

(2) Otherwise as a result of the merger, the person ceases to be a member.

(l) The limited liability company terminates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 419, Sec. 20.   (SB 323)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Operative January 1, 2014, by Sec. 32 of Ch. 419.)
-------------------------------------------

17706.03.

(a) When a person is dissociated as a member of a limited liability company all of the following apply:

(1) The person’s right to vote or participate as a member in the management and conduct of the limited liability company’s activities terminates.
